Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1157
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of Nebraska, and the purpose of the Livestock Auction Market Act, to encourage, stimulate, and stabilize the agricultural economy of the state in general, and the livestock economy in particular, by encouraging the construction, development, and productive operation of livestock auction markets as key industries of the state and those markets' particular trade areas, with all benefits of fully open, free, competitive factors, in respect to sales and purchases of livestock.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 1, p. 961;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 62;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 6.

A livestock auction market has sufficient public interest to be subject to public regulation under the police power. Midwest L. C. Co. v. Tri-State L. C. Co., 182 Neb. 41, 151 N.W.2d 908 (1967).